Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 475B.759, as amended by  section 1, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended
to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to  the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population  of all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)  of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially available  area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number  of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day of the cal-
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 1
endar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account  must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys  in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an  ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070,  475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100  or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that  is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to receive a
transfer of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has re-
ceived a transfer of moneys for that quarter shall  return the amount transferred to the
Department of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of  this subsection.
An ineligible city or county may voluntarily transfer the  moneys to the Department of Re-
venue immediately upon receipt of the ineligible transfer.
(b) If  the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services determines that
a city or  county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(b) of this section but
was ineligible to receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the director  shall
provide notice to the ineligible city  or county and order the city or county to return the
amount received to the  Department of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph
(f) of this subsection. A city or county may appeal the order within 30 days of the  date of
the order under the procedures for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon  as the order under paragraph (b) of this subsection becomes final, the di-
rector shall notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon no-
tification, the Department of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated
in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining
to the collection of income and excise taxes and may proceed to collect the  amounts de-
scribed in the notice under paragraph (c) of this subsection.  An assessment of tax is not
necessary and the collection described in this subsection is not precluded by  any statute of
limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject  to an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer,
the city or county shall be denied any further relief in connection  with the ineligible transfer
on or after the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the rate  established in ORS 305.220 begin-
ning on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys  and the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or
county shall be redistributed to  the cities or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer
under subsection (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 2
[(5)] (6)(a) [ In a form  and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, ] Not
later than July 1 of  each year,  each city and county in this state shall certify with the
[commission] Oregon Department of Administrative Services  whether the city or  county has an
ordinance prohibiting the establishment of  a premises for which issuance of a license under ORS
475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. The certification shall be made concur-
rently with certifications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed  by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with  this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section. If a county fails to  comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 shall  file an
updated certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, noting the effective  date of the change. A city or
county that repeals an ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible  to receive quarterly
transfers of moneys under this  section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the
entire quarter and the updated certification was filed at  least 30 days before the date of
transfer.
SECTION 2.  ORS 475B.759, as amended by sections  1 and 2, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to  the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population  of all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)  of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially available  area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number  of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 3
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in  the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in  the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account established under ORS 430.380
may be used;
(C) Fifteen percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of  a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county  that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of  this section to receive a
transfer of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has re-
ceived a transfer of moneys for that  quarter shall return the amount transferred to the
Department of Revenue,  with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
An ineligible city or county may voluntarily  transfer the moneys to the Department of Re-
venue immediately upon receipt of the ineligible transfer.
(b) If  the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services determines that
a city or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(b) of this  section but
was ineligible to receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the director  shall
provide notice to the ineligible city or county and order the city  or county to return the
amount received to the Department of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph
(f) of this  subsection. A city or county may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of
the order under the procedures for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph (b) of this subsection becomes final,  the di-
rector shall notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon no-
tification, the Department of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated
in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the benefit  of all laws of the state pertaining
to the collection  of income and excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts de-
scribed in the notice under paragraph (c)  of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not
necessary and the collection  described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of
limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject  to an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer,
the city or county shall be denied any further relief in connection  with the ineligible transfer
on or after the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall  accrue at the rate established in ORS 305.220 begin-
ning on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and the interest collected from or returned by an  ineligible city or
county shall be redistributed to  the cities or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer
under subsection (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
[(5)] (6)(a) [ In a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission, ] Not
later than July 1 of each year,  each city and county in this state  shall certify with the
[commission] Oregon Department of  Administrative Services  whether the city or county has an
ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance of  a license under ORS
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 4
475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. The certification shall be made concur-
rently with the certifications under  ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city  is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of  this section. If a county fails to comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city  or county that repeals an ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 shall file an
updated certification with the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, noting the effective  date of the change. A city or
county that repeals an ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible  to receive quarterly
transfers of moneys under this section for quarters where the repeal  is effective for the
entire quarter and the updated certification was filed  at least 30 days before the date of
transfer.
SECTION 3.  ORS 475B.496 is amended to read:
475B.496. (1) The governing body of a city or county may repeal an ordinance that prohibits the
establishment of any one or more of the following in the area subject to the jurisdiction  of the city
or in the unincorporated area subject to the jurisdiction of the county:
(a) Marijuana processing sites registered under ORS 475B.840;
(b) Medical marijuana dispensaries registered under ORS 475B.858;
(c) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.070;
(d) Marijuana processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.090;
(e) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.100;
(f) Marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.105;
(g) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.070 and that the  Oregon
Liquor Control Commission has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.122;
(h) Marijuana processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.090 and that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.127;
(i) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475B.100 and that the commis-
sion has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.129;
(j) Marijuana retailers that hold  a license issued under ORS 475B.105 and that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475B.131; or
(k) Any combination of the entities described in this subsection.
(2) If the  governing body of a city or county repeals an ordinance under this section, the gov-
erning body must provide the text of the ordinance:
(a) To the Oregon Health Authority, in a  form and manner prescribed by the authority, if the
ordinance concerns a medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475B.858 or  a marijuana
processing site registered under ORS 475B.840; or
(b)(A) To the commission, in a form and manner prescribed by  the commission, if the ordinance
concerns a premises for which a license has been issued under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545[ .]; and
(B) To the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department,  within 30 days of enactment of the repeal of the ordinance, if the
ordinance concerns a premises for which issuance of a  license is required under ORS
475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS 475B.496 and  475B.759 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2019
Act apply to transfers of moneys in calendar quarters  beginning on or after January 1, 2020.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 5
Passed by House June 17, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3067 (HB 3067-A) Page 6